California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
-------------------------------------------

1967.4.

Except as specifically provided in Section 1967.5, to the extent that the transportation management agency is granted exclusive powers to adopt regulations and adopt, fix, administer, and collect fees, rates, charges, and other revenues with respect to the transportation program under Section 1967.3, the city and its departments, boards, and commissions shall be prohibited from exercising those powers with respect to Treasure Island and the transportation program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.5.

(a) The board of supervisors, by a two-thirds majority vote, shall have the authority to adopt a program imposing congestion pricing fees for motor vehicles exiting and entering Treasure Island from the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge and an initial congestion pricing fee structure after consideration of the recommendation of the transportation management agency. The congestion
 pricing fees shall not be imposed on local trips on Treasure Island streets that do not exit to the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge. Once adopted, the congestion pricing program may only be terminated by the recommendation of both the authority and the transportation management agency, followed by a two-thirds majority vote of the board of supervisors.

(b) (1) Prior to imposing the initial congestion pricing fees, the board of supervisors shall make a finding of fact
 by a two-thirds majority vote that the congestion pricing fees have a relationship or benefit to the motor vehicle drivers who are paying the fee.

(2) In order to ensure that congestion pricing fees are not instituted prior to new residents establishing residence on Treasure Island, initial congestion pricing fees shall not be imposed prior to the effective date of the disposition and development agreement for the redevelopment of Treasure Island.

(3) All fees, rates, and charges adopted in furtherance of the transportation program, including congestion pricing fees, on-street and off-street parking fees, fines and penalties, transit pass fees, and any other rates and charges that are adopted by the transportation management agency from time to time, be collected and used by the transportation management agency to implement the transportation program.

(c) While congestion pricing fees remain in effect, the transferor of any sale or lease agreement of real property on Treasure Island shall be required to include a written disclosure to the potential purchaser or lessee that use of a motor vehicle to and from Treasure Island may be subject to congestion pricing fees.

(d) At all periods of the day, whether or not the congestion pricing fees are in effect, high-occupancy vehicles shall be able to exit or enter Treasure Island free of charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 417, Sec. 3.   (SB 506)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.6.

The transportation program shall ensure that public access to waterfront, recreational, and open-space areas on Treasure Island is sufficient to support public trust activities by ensuring all of the following:

(a) Public access to areas subject to the public trust is facilitated in part by transportation program elements, such as (1) an on-island shuttle, (2) secure bicycle parking, and (3) limitations on long-term parking on streets that are subject to the public trust following a land exchange authorized by Chapter 543 of the Statutes of 2004, as amended (hereafter public trust streets), that will discourage residential use of public trust streets for parking but allow appropriate time for recreational and visitor activities.

(b) Program elements shall not interfere with the provision of public access to public trust lands consistent with the beneficial use of those lands, including, but not limited to, roadway access to serve the public along the western shoreline of Treasure Island.

(c) There shall be no preference for residents in parking rates, parking passes, or the duration of parking on public trust streets or on other public trust lands.

(d) Parking revenues from public trust streets or other public trust lands shall be used for transportation facilities and services benefiting the public trust in accordance with the transportation program, with any surplus revenues to be used for other trust-related purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.7.

Meetings of the transportation management agency shall be held pursuant to the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.8.

Section 9400.8 of the Vehicle Code shall not apply to any fee imposed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.9.

The city may bring an action pursuant to Sections 860 to 870, inclusive, of the Code of Civil Procedure to confirm the validity of any resolution adopted by the board of supervisors or the transportation management agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.10.

Not later than three years and no sooner than one year after the transportation management agency first collects revenues from the congestion pricing fees authorized under Section 1967.5, the authority shall conduct a public opinion survey regarding the congestion pricing demonstration program and provide a report to the Assembly Committee on Transportation and the Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing on its findings, conclusions, and recommendations concerning the congestion pricing demonstration program authorized by this act. The report shall include an analysis of the success of the congestion pricing demonstration program on minimizing vehicle miles traveled and motor vehicle trips on the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge and increasing public transit use, as well as an economic analysis of the
 program’s impact on funding public transportation improvements and operations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 140, Sec. 176.   (AB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1967.11.

Nothing in this chapter shall affect the authority granted to the Bay Area Toll Authority granted in Article 1 (commencing with Section 30600) of Chapter 2 of Division 17 relating to the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 317, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2.7. COURTESY SIGNS [1970. - 1978.]

1970.

(a) Local authorities, with respect to highways under their respective jurisdictions, may place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, courtesy signs to recognize the sponsors of the Adopt-A-Riverway Program.

(b) Courtesy signs shall be consistent with existing code provisions and department rules and regulations concerning signs.

(c) Courtesy signs shall only be placed upon the highways of a local authority, upon the approval of an authorizing resolution by a majority of the members of the governing body of that local authority. The resolution authorizing the placement of courtesy signs shall include all of the following:

(1) A general plan of where the courtesy signs will be placed within the geographical borders of the local authority, including any street, bike trail, or pedestrian path.

(2) A finding that the planned placement of the courtesy signs would not degrade the natural environment of the area.

(d) Courtesy signs shall contain the title “Adopt-A-Riverway” at the top of the sign and the name or logo of the sponsoring person or entity below the “Adopt-A-Riverway” title. Logos shall be provided at the sponsors’ own cost. Both the title and the logo shall be in large enough fonts that are easily read.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 675, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1975.

(a) Courtesy signs may be awarded by the Department of Food and Agriculture, to persons that donate a minimum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) annually to the Adopt-A-Riverway Fund. Donors may stipulate in which county they desire the courtesy signs be placed and may request specific sign placement within the county.

(b) The Department of Food and Agriculture may enter into an agreement with a local authority for production, placement, and maintenance of courtesy signs to be awarded pursuant to this section.

(c) The costs incurred by the local authorities associated with placing and maintaining courtesy signs shall be paid for out of the Adopt-A-Riverway Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 675, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1978.

(a) County officials, with respect to any state or county highway within their respective jurisdictions and upon a resolution adopted by the respective county board of supervisors, may place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, at or near the county line and at county expense, signs stating or adding to their existing signs the following statement: “Where We Honor Veterans.”

(b) Signs or additions to signs described in subdivision (a) that are on a state highway shall only be placed or added to upon the approval of the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 204, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. APPORTIONMENT AND EXPENDITURE OF HIGHWAY FUNDS [2004.5. - 2704.79.]



CHAPTER 1. The County Road System [2004.5. - 2010.]

2004.5.

Streets in any city which has not held an election of municipal officers within a period of 10 years preceding the date of the proposed inclusion shall be included in the road system of the county in which such city is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1852.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.

(a) The board of supervisors of each county shall appoint a single road commissioner for all road districts in the county. Every person who is appointed road commissioner after December 31, 1965, shall be a registered civil engineer. However, the City and County of San Francisco may appoint a person road commissioner who is not a registered civil engineer. Any person appointed road commissioner on or before December 31, 1965, need not be a registered civil engineer if he or she is approved by the board of supervisors as qualified and competent to handle the road and highway work of the county. Any person who is a road commissioner in any county on December 31, 1965, need not be a registered civil engineer to be appointed road commissioner of another county after December 31, 1965. After October 1, 1952, no person shall be appointed road commissioner until the board of supervisors holds a public hearing on the qualifications of the candidate or candidates for the position of road commissioner. At least 14 days but not more than 30 days prior to the hearing, notice of the hearing shall be posted at the county courthouse and published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. Nothing in this section precludes one person from serving two or more counties. An elective county official shall not be appointed road commissioner after October 1, 1952, unless the official is holding the position of road commissioner on that date. The road commissioner is, at all times, under the direction and supervision of the board of supervisors but may be dismissed, after a hearing, only upon a majority vote of the board. This subdivision does not apply in chartered counties whose charter requires the county surveyor to perform the duties of, or exercise the powers conferred by law on, the road commissioner.

(b) Each county shall furnish evidence to the Controller that it has complied with this section.

(c) Neither the Controller nor any other state officer shall make any allocations or payments to any county from the Highway Users Tax Account in the Transportation Tax Fund until the county has complied with the requirements of this section; except that, if a vacancy occurs in the office of road commissioner of a county, the allocations or payments to the county shall not be suspended pursuant to this section unless the county has not appointed a new road commissioner in accordance with this section within 180 days from the date the vacancy first occurred.

(d) The 180-day time limit is contingent on the condition that there be a qualified acting road commissioner functioning during the interim period under direct appointment by the board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 56, Sec. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.1.

Notwithstanding Section 2006 or Section 2006.5, the board of supervisors of any county may abolish the office of road commissioner if the board transfers all duties of the road commissioner to the county director of transportation. The director of transportation shall not be required to have any special permit, registration, or license. Any civil engineering functions which are required to be performed by the road commissioner shall be performed by a registered civil engineer acting under the authority of the director of transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board of Supervisors of Merced County may abolish the office of road commissioner if the board transfers all duties of the road commissioner to the county director of the department of public works. The director of that department shall not be required to have any special permit, registration, or license. Any civil engineering functions that are required to be performed by the road commissioner shall be performed by a registered civil engineer acting under the authority of the director of that department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 135, Sec. 1.   (SB 907)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.3.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Colusa may abolish the office of road commissioner if the board transfers all duties of the road commissioner to the county director of the department of public works. The director of that department shall not be required to have any special permit, registration, or license. Any civil engineering functions that are required to be performed by the road commissioner shall be performed by a registered civil engineer acting under the authority of the director of that department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 33, Sec. 1.   (SB 79)   Effective June 28, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.4.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Glenn may abolish the office of road commissioner if the board transfers all duties of the road commissioner to the county director of the department of public works. The director of that department shall not be required to have any special permit, registration, or license. Any civil engineering functions that are required to be performed by the road commissioner shall be performed by a registered civil engineer acting under the authority of the director of that department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 33, Sec. 2.   (SB 79)   Effective June 28, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Board of Supervisors of Orange County may abolish the office of road commissioner if the board of supervisors transfers all duties of the road commissioner to an environmental management agency. The director of such environmental management agency shall not be required to have any special permit, registration, or license. Any civil engineering functions which are required to be performed by the road commissioner shall be performed by a registered civil engineer acting under the authority of the director of such agency.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that this section, applicable only to Orange County, is necessary because of the unique and special problems of county road management in Orange County due to the extent of municipal incorporation found in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 426.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.6.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Siskiyou may abolish the office of road commissioner if the board transfers all duties of the road commissioner to the county director of the department of public works. The director of that department shall not be required to have any special permit, registration, or license. Any civil engineering functions that are required to be performed by the road commissioner shall be performed by a registered civil engineer acting under the authority of the director of that department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 24, Sec. 1.   (SB 207)   Effective June 20, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.7.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Tehama may abolish the office of road commissioner if the board transfers all duties of the road commissioner to the county director of the department of public works. The director of that department shall not be required to have any special permit, registration, or license. Any civil engineering functions that are required to be performed by the road commissioner shall be performed by a registered civil engineer acting under the authority of the director of that department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 399, Sec. 1.   (AB 1479)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2006.8.

Notwithstanding any other law, the Board of Supervisors of the County of Madera may abolish the office of road commissioner if the board transfers all duties of the road commissioner to the county director of the department of public works. The director of that department shall not be required to have any special permit, registration, or license. Any civil engineering functions that are required to be performed by the road commissioner shall be performed by a registered civil engineer acting under the authority of the director of that department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 399, Sec. 2.   (AB 1479)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2007.

The road commissioner shall each year prepare a tentative road budget covering all proposed expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year for county road purposes. The road commissioner shall submit the budget to the board of supervisors in accordance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 29000) of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code and in the form and manner prescribed by the Controller and at the same time as other county departments submit their recommended budgets.

The board of supervisors shall hold public hearings on the proposed road budget at the same time as the general county budget is considered and after like notice. In adopting the budget, the board may make such changes and revisions as it considers will subserve the public interest.

After adoption of the budget by the board of supervisors, the road commissioner shall not obligate or expend funds appropriated for county road purposes other than as set forth in the budget as adopted. However, the board of supervisors may, by appropriate action at any regular or special meeting, authorize the cancellation or transfer, in whole or in part, of any appropriation or appropriations set forth in the budget and reappropriate funds thus canceled for road purposes not set forth in the budget or to expenditure classifications insufficiently provided for where this action will best serve the interests of the people. Funds transferred pursuant to this section, or as authorized by the board of supervisors, shall immediately be made available for expenditure by the road commissioner for road purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

2008.

The board of supervisors shall fix the salary of the road commissioner. It shall be chargeable against the one thousand six hundred sixty-seven dollars ($1,667) monthly apportionment to the county under subdivision (a) of Section 2104. Such road commissioner shall be required to file an official bond in an amount determined by the board of supervisors, unless he is covered by a master bond pursuant to Section 1481 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 112.)
-------------------------------------------

2009.

The board of supervisors shall act as the policymaking body with respect to county highway matters and shall by appropriate action establish the general policies to be followed by the road commissioner in the administration of his department. The road commissioner shall administer his department and carry out the general policies of the board in conformity with the estimates of expenditures fixed in the budget as finally adopted by the board or as thereafter revised by appropriate action of the board. The commissioner shall employ such assistants and employees as may be necessary, in conformity with the budget and county policies and procedure with respect to personnel and subject to the approval of the board of the salary or other compensation to be paid. The commissioner shall have sole supervision and jurisdiction over personnel and over the assignments of personnel engaged in work on county roads. The commissioner may purchase, lease, or hire such equipment as may be necessary for county road purposes, in conformity with the budget and policies of the county with respect to purchases and rentals and subject to approval of the board as to the price or rental. The commissioner shall have sole jurisdiction over the assignment of equipment used for county road work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1671.)
-------------------------------------------

2010.

In order that the provisions of this chapter may be effectively carried out, the members of the board of supervisors of their respective counties shall make reasonable inspection from time to time of the roads within their counties maintained from funds supplied by this chapter. The additional mileage entailed by this section, not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600) in any one year, shall be a proper charge against and shall be paid from the one thousand six hundred sixty-seven dollars ($1,667) monthly apportionment to the county under subdivision (a) of Section 2104.

Such mileage shall be deemed to be in addition to any other mileage allowed by law or county charter, and each supervisor who uses a privately owned automobile in the discharge of duties imposed upon him in connection with the county road system shall receive for the performance of such duties in addition to the compensation and any other allowances paid him as supervisor, but not in duplication of any other mileage allowed by law or county charter, twenty-five dollars ($25) per month for the first 250 miles traveled, without filing a report of the specific inspection tours requiring such mileage. For mileage traveled in excess of 250 miles, each supervisor shall be paid ten cents ($0.10) for each mile traveled up to 250 miles or twenty-five dollars ($25) for a total not to exceed 500 miles or fifty dollars ($50). The supervisor claiming such additional mileage shall file a report of the inspection tour or tours requiring such travel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 92.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Program [2030. - 2038.]

2030.

(a) The Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Program is hereby created to address deferred maintenance on the state highway system and the local street and road system. Funds made available by the program shall be prioritized for expenditure on basic road maintenance and road rehabilitation projects, and on critical safety projects.

(b) (1) Funds made available by the program shall be used for projects that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Road maintenance and rehabilitation.

(B) Safety projects.

(C) Railroad grade
 separations.

(D) Complete street components, including active transportation purposes, pedestrian and bicycle safety projects, transit facilities, and drainage and stormwater capture projects in conjunction with any other allowable project.

(E) Traffic control devices.

(2) Funds made available by the program may also be used to satisfy a match requirement in order to obtain state or federal funds for projects authorized by this subdivision.

(c) To the extent possible and cost effective, and where feasible, the department and cities and counties receiving funds under the program shall use advanced technologies and material recycling techniques that reduce the cost of maintaining
 and rehabilitating the streets and highways, and that exhibit reduced levels of greenhouse gas emissions through material choice and construction method.

(d) To the extent possible and cost effective, and where feasible, the department and cities and counties receiving funds under the program shall use advanced technologies and communications systems in transportation infrastructure that recognize and accommodate advanced automotive technologies that may include, but are not necessarily limited to, charging or fueling opportunities for zero-emission vehicles, and provision of infrastructure-to-vehicle communications for transitional or full autonomous vehicle systems.

(e) To the extent deemed cost effective, and where feasible, in the context of both the project scope and the risk level for the asset due to global climate change, the department and cities and counties receiving
 funds under the program shall include features in the projects funded by the program to better adapt the asset to withstand the negative effects of climate change and make the asset more resilient to impacts such as fires, floods, and sea level rise.

(f) To the extent beneficial, cost effective, and practicable in the context of facility type, right-of-way, project scope, and quality of nearby alternative facilities, and where feasible, the department and cities and counties receiving funds under the program shall incorporate complete street elements into projects funded by the program, including, but not limited to, elements that improve the quality of bicycle and pedestrian facilities and that improve safety for all users of transportation facilities.

(g) For purposes of funds directed to the State Highway Operation and Protection Program, the guidelines and reporting provisions
 shall be consistent with Section 14526.5 of the Government Code.

(h) Guidelines adopted by the commission to facilitate the allocation of funds in the account shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 36.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2031.

The following revenues shall be deposited in the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account, which is hereby created in the State Transportation Fund:

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2103 and pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2103.1, the portion of the revenues in the Highway Users Tax Account attributable to the increases in the motor vehicle fuel excise tax pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 7360 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d) of that section.

(b) The revenues from the portion of the transportation improvement fee pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 11053 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(c) The revenues from the increase in the vehicle registration fee pursuant to Section 9250.6 of the Vehicle Code, as adjusted pursuant to subdivision (b) of that section.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 2103 and pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2103.1, one-half of the revenues attributable to the increase in the diesel fuel excise tax pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 60050 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(e) Any other revenues designated for the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 36.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2031.5.

For each fiscal year, the annual Budget Act shall contain an appropriation from the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account for the costs of administering this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 5, Sec. 36.   (SB 1)   Effective April 28, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2032.

(a) (1) After deducting the amounts appropriated in the annual Budget Act, as provided in Section 2031.5, two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) of the remaining revenues deposited in the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account shall be set aside annually for local or regional transportation agencies that have sought and received voter approval of taxes or that have imposed fees, including uniform developer fees as defined by subdivision (b) of Section 8879.67 of the Government Code, which taxes or fees are dedicated solely to transportation improvements. The Controller shall each month set aside one-twelfth of this amount, except in fiscal year 2017–18, the Controller shall set aside one-eighth of this amount, to accumulate a total of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) in each fiscal year.
 The Controller may adjust the amount in the final month or months of each fiscal year if necessary to achieve the annual amount specified in this subdivision.

(2) Eligible projects under this subdivision include, but not are limited to, sound walls for a freeway that was built before 1987 without sound walls and with or without high-occupancy vehicle lanes if the completion of the sound walls has been deferred due to lack of available funding for at least 20 years and a noise barrier scope summary report has been completed within the last 20 years.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the funds available under this subdivision in each fiscal year are hereby continuously appropriated for allocation by the commission for road maintenance and rehabilitation and other transportation improvement projects pursuant to Section 2033.

(b) After deducting the amounts appropriated in the annual Budget Act pursuant to Section 2031.5 and the amount allocated in subdivision (a), beginning in the 2017–18 fiscal year, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) of the remaining revenues shall be available annually for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, on the Active Transportation Program created pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2380) of Division 3 to be allocated by the California Transportation Commission pursuant to Section 2381. The Controller shall each month set aside one-twelfth of this amount, except in the 2017–18 fiscal year, when the Controller shall set aside one-eighth of this amount, to accumulate a total of one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) in each fiscal year. The Controller may adjust the amount in the final month or months of each fiscal year if necessary to achieve the annual amount specified in this subdivision.

(c) After deducting the amounts appropriated in the annual Budget Act pursuant to Section 2031.5 and the amounts allocated in subdivisions (a) and (b), beginning in the 2017–18 fiscal year, four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) of the remaining revenues shall be available annually for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the department for bridge and culvert maintenance and rehabilitation. The Controller shall each month set aside one-twelfth of this amount, except in the 2017–18 fiscal year, when the Controller shall set aside one-eighth of this amount, to accumulate a total of four hundred million dollars ($400,000,000) in each fiscal year. The Controller may adjust the amount in the final month or months of each fiscal year if necessary to achieve the annual amount specified in this subdivision.

(d) After deducting the amounts appropriated in the annual
 Budget Act pursuant to Section 2031.5 and the amounts allocated in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), beginning in the 2017–18 fiscal year, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of the remaining revenues shall be transferred annually to the State Highway Account for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to supplement the freeway service patrol program. The Controller shall each month set aside one-twelfth of this amount, except in the 2017–18 fiscal year, when the Controller shall set aside one-eighth of this amount, to accumulate a total of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in each fiscal year. The Controller may adjust the amount in the final month or months of each fiscal year if necessary to achieve the annual amount specified in this subdivision.

(e) After deducting the amounts appropriated in the annual Budget Act pursuant to Section 2031.5 and the amounts allocated in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (d), in the
 2017–18, 2018–19, 2019–20, 2020–21, and 2021–22 fiscal years, from revenues in the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account that are not subject to Article XIX of the California Constitution, five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be appropriated in each fiscal year to the California Workforce Development Board to assist local agencies to implement policies to promote preapprenticeship training programs to carry out the projects that are funded by the account pursuant to Section 2038. Funds appropriated pursuant to this subdivision in the Budget Act but remaining unexpended at the end of each applicable fiscal year shall be reappropriated for the same purposes in the following year’s Budget Act, but all funds appropriated or reappropriated pursuant to this subdivision in the Budget Act shall be liquidated no later than June 30, 2027.

(f) After deducting the amounts appropriated in the annual Budget Act pursuant to Section 2031.5 and the
 amounts allocated in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), and (e), beginning in the 2017–18 fiscal year, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of the remaining revenues shall be available annually for expenditure, upon appropriation by the Legislature, by the department for local planning grants, as described in Section 2033.5. The Controller shall each month set aside one-twelfth of this amount, except in the 2017–18 fiscal year, when the Controller shall set aside one-eighth of this amount, to accumulate a total of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in each fiscal year. The Controller may adjust the amount in the final month or months of each fiscal year if necessary to achieve the annual amount specified in this subdivision.

(g) After deducting the amounts appropriated in the annual Budget Act pursuant to Section 2031.5 and the amounts allocated in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (d), (e), and (f), beginning in the 2017–18 fiscal year and
 each fiscal year thereafter, from the remaining revenues, five million dollars ($5,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation, to the University of California for the purpose of conducting transportation research and two million dollars ($2,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation, to the California State University for the purpose of conducting transportation research and transportation-related workforce education, training, and development. Before the start of each fiscal year, the Secretary of Transportation and the chairs of the Assembly Committee on Transportation and the Senate Committee on Transportation and Housing may set out a recommended priority list of research components to be addressed in the upcoming fiscal year.

(h) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the balance of the revenues deposited in the Road Maintenance and Rehabilitation Account are hereby continuously appropriated as follows:

(1) Fifty percent for allocation to the department for maintenance of the state highway system or for purposes of the state highway operation and protection program.

(2) Fifty percent for apportionment to cities and counties by the Controller pursuant to the formula in clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (C) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 2103 for the purposes authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 205.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

2032.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Department of Transportation and local governments are held accountable for the efficient investment of public funds to maintain the public highways, streets, and roads, and are accountable to the people through performance goals that are tracked and reported.

(b) The department shall annually report to the commission relative to the expenditures made with funds received pursuant to subdivision (c) of, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of, Section 2032, and the progress made and achievement of the performance goals outlined in subdivision (n) of Section 1 of the act adding this section.

(c) For each fiscal year in which the department receives an allocation of funds described in subdivision (b), the department shall submit documentation to the commission that includes a description and the location of each completed project, the amount of funds expended on the project, the completion date, and the project’s estimated useful life. Annually, the commission shall evaluate the effectiveness of the department in reducing deferred maintenance and improving road conditions on the state highway system, as demonstrated by the progress made by the goals set forth in subdivision (n) of Section 1 of the act enacting
 this section. The commission may make recommendations for improvement and may withhold future project allocations if it determines program funds are not being appropriately spent. The commission shall annually include any findings in its annual report to the Legislature pursuant to Section 14535 of the Government Code.

(d) The department shall implement efficiency measures with the goal to generate at least one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) per year in savings to invest in maintenance and rehabilitation of the state highway system. These savings shall be reported to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 20, Sec. 16.   (AB 115)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2033.

(a) On or before January 1, 2018, the commission, in cooperation with the department, transportation planning agencies, county transportation commissions, and other local agencies, shall develop guidelines for the allocation of funds pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 2032.

(b) The guidelines shall be the complete and full statement of the policy, standards, and criteria that the commission intends to use to determine how these funds will be allocated.

(c) The commission may amend the adopted guidelines after conducting at least one public hearing.
